District of Columbia statutes.
31-3805

Exclusions.

Specifically excluded from the coverage requirements of this chapter are Medicare Supplement insurance policies, accident only policies, dread disease policies, student accident policies, nursing home policies, and home health care policies.

Oct. 20, 1979, D.C. Law 3-33, § 6
as added May 21, 1992, D.C. Law 9-99,§ 2(c), 39 DCR 2142
1981 Ed., § 35-1105.
Hospital and medical services corporations, applicability of this section, see § 31-3503.